Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB30.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6(a.1) of the act of July 10, 1990 (P.L.404, No.98), known as the Real Estate Appraisers Certification Act, is amended to read:Section 6. Application and qualifications.* * *(a.1) Appraiser trainee license.--In addition to the certificates authorized in subsection (a), the board shall issue an appraiser trainee license, without examination, to any person who meets the appraiser trainee educational requirements set by the board and who does not already hold an appraiser credential under subsection (a). An appraiser trainee shall operate under 12345678910111213141516171819 the direct supervision of one certified residential appraiser or certified general appraiser per assignment for the purpose of completing the experience requirement for an appraiser credential in subsection (a). An appraiser trainee shall be permitted to assist in the performance of any appraisal that is within the supervisory appraiser's scope of practice. The supervisory appraiser shall be in good standing, have at least [five] three years of experience as a certified residential appraiser or certified general appraiser and shall not supervise more than three appraiser trainees.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0030PN0011 - 2 - 123456789101112